Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1401
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) The land,
water, and other resources of Nebraska are being severely impacted by the
invasion of an increasing number of harmful invasive species;

(2) These impacts
are resulting in damage to Nebraska's environment and causing economic hardships;
and

(3) The multitude of public and private organizations with an interest
in controlling and preventing the spread of harmful invasive species in Nebraska
need a mechanism for cooperation, communication, collaboration, and developing
a statewide plan of action to meet these threats.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 11.